Utah statutes.
4-38-2.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Commission" means the Utah Horse Racing Commission created by this
chapter.
(2)  "Executive director" means the executive director of the commission.
(3)  "Mixed meet" means a race meet that includes races by more than one breed
of horse.
(4)  "Race meet" means the entire period of time for which a licensee has been
approved by the commission to hold horse races.
(5)  "Racetrack facility" means a racetrack within Utah approved by the
commission for the racing of horses, including the track surface, grandstands,
clubhouse, all animal housing and handling areas, and other areas in which a
person may enter only upon payment of an admission fee or upon presentation of
authorized credentials.
(6)  "Recognized race meet" means a race meet recognized by a national horse
breed association.
(7)  "Utah bred horse" means a horse that is sired by a stallion standing in
Utah at the time the dam was bred.
